Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB86.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 217C.010 is amended to read as follows:
It is the intent of this chapter to provide for uniform state standards and requirements for
milk and milk products. No standard or requirement shall be imposed by a local
regulation or ordinance which prohibits the sale of milk, unpasteurized milk, and milk
products which are produced, processed, and sold in conformity with the provisions of
this chapter.
Section 2. KRS 217C.020 is amended to read as follows:
No local governmental agency shall impose by ordinance, regulation, or otherwise any
inspection fee involving the production, processing and sale of milk, unpasteurized milk,
and milk products.
Section 3. KRS 217C.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall adopt rules and administrative regulations regulating the
production, transportation, processing, handling, sampling, examination, grading,
labeling, standards of identity, and sale of milk and milk products; the inspection of
dairy herds, dairy farms, and milk plants; the issuing and revocation of permits to
milk producers, haulers, transfer stations, processing plants, pasteurization plants,
and distributors; the procedures for selection of advisory committee nominees; and
regulating such other matters relating to milk and milk products as may be
necessary to protect the public health. The secretary shall adopt separate
administrative regulations regulating grade A milk products and milk for
manufacturing purposes.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of the law or administrative regulation to the
contrary, the sale of unpasteurized milk to a consumer shall not be prohibited.
Section 4. The following KRS section is repealed:
217C.090 Sale of unpasteurized goat milk.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/3/2025 11:27 AM Jacketed